Mississippi, session 2026, HB4118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Mary Wayne Prater of Oktibbeha County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for the crime of False Pretense in Oktibbeha County, Mississippi, for which she was sentenced on October 29, 2002, to serve sixty (60) months probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  She violated probation; it was revoked and she was sentenced to one (1) year of House Arrest and two (2) years probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. She was discharged from House Arrest on May 5, 2005, then violated probation and it was revoked.  She was sentenced on January 25, 2007, in Oktibbeha County, Mississippi, to serve two (2) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. She was released on September 10, 2007, and discharged on May 12, 2008.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.